test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lugwma76_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - lugõma: # Verb (76) lugõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     lugõma+V+Inf/mA: lugõma
     lugõma+V+Inf: [lukõq, lukeq]
     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: lugõnuq
     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: loet


##

     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: loe
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [loet, loedõq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lugõ
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: loemiq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: loetiq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lugõvaq
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: loe
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [loi, loie, lugõsi]
#     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kaotit, kaodiq, kaotidõq]
     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lugi
#     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaotimiq
#     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaotitiq
#     lugõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kaodiq, kaotivaq]

#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaotõda
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaotõdas

#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotav

#     lugõma+V+Jus: kaotaguq
##
#viskama => kaotama
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaotõda
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kaotõdat, kaotõdadõq]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaotõdas
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kaotõdamiq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kaotõdatiq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kaotõdasõq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaotõda

#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaotõdi
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kaotõdit, kaotõdiq, kaotõdidõq]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotõdi
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaotõdimiq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaotõditiq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kaotõdiq, kaotõdivaq]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kaotõda

#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotav
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotava
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kaotavat
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotavahe
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotavaq
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotavidõ, kaotaviidõ]
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotavit, kaotaviid]
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotavihe, kaotaviihe]
                    
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõdav
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotõdava
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kaotõdavat
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotõdavahe
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotõdavaq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotõdavidõ, kaotõdaviidõ]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotõdavit, kaotõdaviid]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotõdavihe, kaotõdaviihe]

#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotanuq
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotanu
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kaotanut
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotanuhe
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotanuq
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotanuidõ, kaotanuisi]
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotanuid, kaotanuisi]
#     lugõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotanuihe, kaotanuisihe]

#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõt
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotõdu
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kaotõdut
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotõduhe
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotõduq
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotõduidõ, kaotõduisi]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotõduid, kaotõduisi]
#     lugõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotõduihe, kaotõduisihe]
